Maine, session 132, LD1748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA c. 51 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 51
ENERGY PROJECT DEVELOPMENT INFORMATION
§3901. Energy project development information
1. Fact sheet and technical resource guide. The Department of Labor, in partnership
with the Governor's Energy Office, the Public Utilities Commission and the Office of
Policy Innovation and the Future, or successor governmental departments and offices
having jurisdiction over energy matters, shall develop a fact sheet and technical resource
guide that clearly outlines the requirements, opportunities, expectations and responsibilities
detailed in state labor laws, rules and priority selection opportunities for entities developing
assisted projects, as defined in section 1304, subsection 1-A, with a nameplate capacity of
one megawatt or more in the State. The fact sheet and technical resource guide must:
A. Incorporate relevant information included in the Department of Labor's training on
wage and hour laws compliance, with a focus on state labor and workforce
requirements and benchmarks related to energy projects and programs;
B. Include relevant labor standards, benchmarks and other necessary commitments
required by the State, the Public Utilities Commission, the University of Maine System
and any other entity responsible for administering energy generation and transmission
projects and programming in the State to receive preference or priority selection related
to requests for proposals;
C. Clearly outline the statutory labor requirements of contractors and subcontractors
performing work on energy projects;
Page 1 - 132LR1553(03)

D. Include information on statutory obligations of employers and the Department of
Labor's enforcement procedures and penalties for violations; and
E. Be updated as necessary and reviewed by the Department of Labor no less than
once per calendar year.
The fact sheet and technical resource guide must be disseminated to entities developing
assisted projects in the State no less than once per calendar year.
2. Attestation of review and understanding of assisted project requirements. An
entity responsible for the development of an assisted project, as defined in section 1304,
subsection 1-A, with a nameplate capacity of one megawatt or more and the entity's chosen
prime contracting entity shall each separately attest under penalty of perjury that the entity:
A. Has reviewed the materials described in subsection 1, paragraphs A to D and that
the entity understands the requirements as outlined;
B. Is aware of the resources available to assist in the entity’s understanding and to
facilitate compliance; and
C. Has made all contractors and subcontractors aware of the requirements outlined in
subsection 1, paragraphs A to D.
Completed attestations must be submitted by both entities on a yearly basis to the
Department of Labor before work may begin on any phase of site preparation, construction,
retrofitting or demolition work.
3. Report. Beginning February 15, 2027 and annually thereafter, the Department of
Labor shall submit to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over labor matters a report that contains the following information from the previous
calendar year:
A. Data related to the number of assisted projects, as defined in section 1304,
subsection 1-A, with a nameplate capacity of one megawatt or more;
B. The number of and list of entities to which fact sheets and technical resource guides
were disseminated, as required under subsection 1;
C. Data on the instances and types of technical assistance provided by the Department
of Labor; and
D. A list of attestations received by the Department of Labor as required under
subsection 2.
The Department of Labor does not need to submit any information required in the report
under this subsection if that information is required to be submitted in any other report to
the Legislature in the same calendar year.
Page 2 - 132LR1553(03)